Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 7 Federal Old-Age and Survivors’ Insurance

36-7-1.
Purpose of provisions.

It is the intention of the legislature by the passage of §§

36-7-1

—

36-7-31

to extend to the officers and employees of the several cities and towns of the state, including any department, division, agency, or instrumentality thereof, and to the officers and employees of the state, including any department, division, agency, or instrumentality of the state including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, quasi-municipal corporations, fire districts, water districts, water authorities, housing authorities and other independent instrumentalities organized and existing under the laws and authority of the state of Rhode Island, and to the dependents and survivors of such officers and employees, the old-age and survivors insurance provisions of title II of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 401 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-1

.

36-7-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of §§

36-7-1

—

36-7-31

,

36-7-33.1

, and

36-7-35

, the following terms shall have the meanings indicated unless different meanings are clearly expressed or required by the context:

“Agency of the state” shall mean:

All departments, divisions, agencies, and instrumentalities of the state which are not juristic entities, legally separate and distinct from the state;

Civilian employees of the Rhode Island national guard; or

Any instrumentality of the state such as fire districts, water districts, water authorities, sewer commissions and authorities, housing authorities, or other instrumentality of the state which are a juristic entity and legally separate and distinct from the state and if the employees of the instrumentality are not by virtue of their relation to juristic entity employees of the state. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, examples of those agencies would be the Kent County water authority, the Providence housing authority, the Blackstone Valley sewer district commission, and other like instrumentalities of the state.

“City or town” shall mean:

Any city or town of the state of Rhode Island, inclusive of any department, division, agency, board, commission, or bureau thereof;

Any instrumentality of a city or town which is a juristic entity and legally separate and distinct from the city or town and if its employees are not by virtue of their relation to the juristic entity employees of the city or town; or

Any instrumentality of two or more citizens and/or towns which is a juristic entity as provided in subdivision (ii) hereof.

“IRC” shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

“Coverage group” shall mean:

All employees of the state other than those engaged in performing service in connection with a proprietary function;

All employees of a city or town other than those engaged in performing service in connection with a single proprietary function;

All employees of the state engaged in performing service in connection with a single proprietary function;

All employees of an agency of the state;

All employees of a city or town of the state engaged in performing service in connection with a single proprietary function. If under the preceding sentence an employee would be included in more than one coverage group by reason of the fact that he or she performs service in connection with two (2) or more proprietary functions or in connection with both a proprietary function and a nonproprietary function, he or she shall be included in only one coverage group. The determination of the coverage group in which the employee shall be included shall be made in such manner as may be specified in the agreement. Members of retirement systems shall constitute separate coverage groups as provided in §

36-7-10

.

“Employee” shall mean any officer or employee of any city, town, or agency of the state receiving salaries or wages for employment.

“Employment” shall mean any service performed by an employee for wages as a member of a coverage group as herein defined, including service of an emergency nature, service in any class or classes of elective positions and service in part-time positions, but excluding the following:

Service in a position the compensation for which is on a fee basis;

Service performed by election officials or election workers for calendar year 2003 in which the remuneration paid for that service is less than one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250), and for each calendar year after 2003 in which the remuneration paid is less than the adjusted amount in accordance with section 218(c)(8)(B) of the Social Security Act;

Service which under the federal Social Security Act may not be included in an agreement between the state and the secretary entered into under this chapter;

Service which, in the absence of an agreement entered into under §§

36-7-1

—

36-7-3

1, would constitute “employment” as defined in the federal Social Security Act. Service which under the federal Social Security Act may be included in an agreement only upon certification by the governor in accordance with § 218(d)(3) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 418(d)(3), shall be included in the term “employment” if and when the governor issues, with respect to that service, a certificate to the secretary, pursuant to §

36-7-19

.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, if pursuant to § 141 of P.L. 92-603, 42 U.S.C. § 418, the state agreement with the federal government referred to in §

36-7-3

is modified appropriately at any time prior to January 1, 1974, the term “employment” with respect to any coverage group specified in the modification shall, effective after the effective date specified in the modification, include services in designated part-time positions but not services performed in the employ of a school, college, or university by a student who is enrolled and regularly attending classes at that school, college, or university.

“FARP” shall mean the FICA Alternative Retirement Income Security Program as described in §

36-7-33.1

.

“FARP-eligible employee” shall mean any part-time, seasonal, or temporary employee of the state of Rhode Island who is ineligible for participation in the Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island.

“FARP part-time employee” shall mean an employee of the state of Rhode Island who works less than twenty (20) hours per week, in accordance with IRC standards.

“Federal Insurance Contributions Act” or “FICA” shall mean subchapter A of chapter 9 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1939, subchapters A and B of chapter 21 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1954, and subchapters A and B of chapter 21 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as those codes have been and may from time to time be amended; and the term “employee tax” shall mean the tax imposed by § 1400 of the code of 1939, § 3101 of the code of 1954, and § 3101 of the code of 1986.

“Federal Social Security Act,” 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., shall mean the act of Congress approved August 14, 1935, officially cited as the “Social Security Act,” including any amendments thereto, and any regulations, directives, or requirements interpretative or implementive thereof.

“Part-time employment” shall mean any employment by those who work on a regularly scheduled basis regardless of hours.

“Retirement board” shall mean the retirement board as provided in chapter 8 of this title.

“Secretary,” except when used in the title “secretary of the treasury,” shall mean the secretary of health and human services and any individual to whom the secretary of health and human services has delegated any of his or her functions under the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., with respect to coverage under that act of employees of states and their political subdivisions.

“Sick pay” shall mean the amount of any payment (including any amount paid by an employer for insurance or annuities, or into a fund to provide for any sick pay) made to, or on behalf of, an employee or any of his or her dependents under a plan or system established by an employer which makes provision for his employees generally (or for his or her employees generally and their dependents) or for a class or classes of his employees (or for a class or classes of his employees and their dependents), on account of sickness or accident disability.

“State” shall mean the state of Rhode Island.

“Wages” or “salaries” shall mean all compensation received by an employee for employment as defined herein, including the cash value of all remuneration received by an employee in any medium other than cash, except that this term shall not include that part of the remuneration which, even if it were for “employment” within the meaning of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, 26 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq., would not constitute “wages” within the meaning of that act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 2; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-2

; P.L. 1968, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 9, § 2.

36-7-3.
Agreement with federal government.

The general treasurer of the state is hereby authorized to enter, on behalf of the state, into an agreement with the secretary, consistent with the terms and provisions of this chapter, for the purpose of extending the benefits of the old age and survivors insurance provisions of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., to employees of any city or town or agency of the state with respect to services specified in the agreement which constitute employment as defined in §

36-7-2

. The agreement may contain provisions relating to coverage, benefits, contributions, effective date, modification, and termination of the agreement, administration, and other appropriate provisions as the general treasurer and the secretary shall agree upon, but, except as may otherwise be required by or under the federal Social Security Act as to the services to be covered, the agreement shall provide in effect that:

Benefits will be provided for employees included in the coverage groups to which the agreement is made applicable on the same basis as though the services constituted employment within the meaning of title II of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 401 et seq.

The state will pay the secretary of the treasury at such time or times as may be prescribed under the federal Social Security Act, contributions with respect to wages (as herein defined) equal to the sum of the taxes which would be imposed by §§ 3101 and 3111 of the federal Insurance Contributions Act, 26 U.S.C. §§ 3101 and 3111, or as that act may be amended from time to time, on all participants under this agreement, including cities, towns, and agencies of the state and all participating employees thereof, if the services covered by the agreement constituted employment within the meaning of that act.

The agreement or any modification of the agreement shall be effective with respect to services in employment covered by the agreement or any modification of the agreement after a date specified therein.

All services which constitute employment as herein defined, which are performed in the employ of any city, town, or agency of the state and are included under a method of coverage which conforms to the terms and conditions of the agreement are covered thereunder.

As modified, the agreement shall include all services described in subdivision (4) of this section and performed by individuals to whom § 218(c)(3)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 418(c)(3)(B), is applicable and shall provide that the service of the individual shall continue to be covered by the agreement in case he or she thereafter becomes eligible to be a member of a retirement system; and as modified, the agreement shall include all services described in subdivision (4) of this section and performed by individuals in positions covered by a retirement system with respect to which the governor has issued a certificate to the secretary pursuant to §

36-7-19

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 3; P.L. 1953, ch. 3198, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-3

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 98, § 1.

36-7-4.
Application to state employees.

The provisions of this chapter, insofar as the provisions shall be applicable, shall apply in the case of employees in the agencies of the state as defined in §

36-7-2(3)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 9; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-4

; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 19.

36-7-5.
Civilian employees of national guard.

The benefits of this chapter are also extended to civilian employees of the Rhode Island national guard who are employed pursuant to § 90 of the National Defense Act of June 3, 1916, 32 U.S.C. § 709, and paid from funds allotted by the department of defense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3418, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-5

.

36-7-6.
Subscription to agreement by city, town, or state agency.

Any city, town, or agency of the state as defined in §

36-7-2(2)

shall have the option of subscribing to the federal state agreement as described in §

36-7-3

. The action shall be taken by the adoption of an ordinance, resolution, or vote by the legislative body thereof which shall be the city council in the case of a city, or a financial town meeting in the case of a town, or the board of directors, authority, commissioners, trustees, or other governing body in the case of an agency of the state. The resolution, ordinance, or vote shall indicate its intention of extending the benefits of title II of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 401 et seq., in conformity with the provisions of that act, to employees of the city, town, or agency of the state as a coverage group, as herein defined. The resolution, ordinance, or vote, to be acceptable, must contain at least the following provisions, requirements, and conditions:

To meet fully the requirements of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., and be in accord with the provisions of the federal state agreement herein provided;

To provide that all services which constitute employment as herein defined and are performed in the employ of the city or town or agency of the state by employees thereof, shall be included in the designated coverage group;

To specify the source or sources from which funds necessary to make contributions in the amounts and at the rates specified in the federal state agreement, are expected to be derived, and contain reasonable assurance that those sources will at all times be adequate to meet this obligation;

To provide for such methods of administration of its plan of participation under the agreement as will insure the proper and effective operation thereof;

To provide that the city, town, or agency of the state will make such reports, in such form and containing such information as may be prescribed from time to time by the general treasurer in accordance with directives or regulations of the secretary, and that the city, town, or agency of the state will at all times comply with such other rules or regulations as the general treasurer or the administrator may from time to time prescribe to assure the correctness and verification of the reports.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 5; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-6

.

36-7-7.
Filing of resolution, ordinance, or vote — Contributions — Effective date.

The resolution, ordinance, or vote, when adopted, shall be filed with the general treasurer of the state. Upon notification by the general treasurer that the provisions of this agreement have been approved by the secretary and are in full force and effect as of the effective date of participation of the city, town, or agency of the state, the appropriate officials thereof shall begin to withhold the contribution required from those employees for that coverage and to allocate from its corporate fund an amount equal to the amount of tax which would be imposed upon an employer by § 3111 of the federal Insurance Contributions Act, 26 U.S.C. § 3111, if the services for the political subdivision covered by the federal state agreement constituted employment within the meaning of the act. The contributions by the employees and the employer shall accrue beginning as of the effective date of participation of such city, town, or agency of the state as specified by the general treasurer. Unless otherwise specified in the resolution, ordinance, or vote and agreed to by the general treasurer and the secretary, the effective date of participation of any city, town, or agency of the state shall be the first day of the calendar year in which the ordinance, resolution, or vote shall be adopted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 5; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-7

.

36-7-8.
Termination of participation for failure of city, town, or agency to meet requirements.

The general treasurer is authorized to terminate participation under the agreement of any city, town, or agency of the state, in his or her discretion, if he or she finds that there has been a failure to comply substantially with any provision contained in the resolution, ordinance, or vote, or under the federal state agreement, the termination to take effect at the expiration of the notice and under such conditions as may be provided under the federal state agreement consistent with the provisions of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-8

.

36-7-9.
Denial of participation to city, town, or agency.

The general treasurer may deny participation under the federal state agreement to any city, town, or agency of the state only upon reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing to the city, town, or agency of the state affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-9

.

36-7-10.
Retirement system defined.

A retirement system for the purposes hereof shall mean any annuity, pension, or retirement fund or system established by state law or by action of a city, town, or agency of the state. Pursuant to § 218(d)(6) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 418, the employees retirement system of the state of Rhode Island created by chapters 8 to 10 of this title, shall, for the purposes of §§

36-7-1

—

36-7-31

be deemed to constitute a separate retirement system with respect to the state and a separate retirement system with respect to each city or town having positions covered thereby.

Effective as of the date § 218(d)(6) of the Social Security Act, as amended by public law 880, 84th congress, is made applicable to the state of Rhode Island, the separate retirement system established by the preceding sentence with respect to the state, and the separate retirement systems established by that sentence with respect to each city or town shall, for the purposes of this chapter, also be deemed to constitute two (2) retirement systems with respect to the state, and in the case of any the city or town, two (2) retirement systems with respect to the city or town, one of which is composed of the positions of members of that system who have expressed their desire to be covered under the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., and all individuals becoming members of that system after the date coverage under the Social Security Act is extended, and the other of which is composed of the positions of members who have not expressed a desire for that coverage.

In case of such division of a system in accordance with the desire of the members thereof, the position of any member of the deemed system composed of the positions of members who did not express a desire to be covered under the Social Security Act may be transferred in the manner and to the extent permitted by § 218(d) of the Social Security Act to the deemed system composed of the positions of members who did express to be so covered.

Further, in case of such division of a system, an individual who is in a position covered by that retirement system and who is not a member thereof, but who is eligible to be a member, shall be considered to be a member, and social security coverage shall be obtained for that individual to the extent permitted by § 218(d)(6)(E) of the Social Security Act.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the coverage under the Social Security Act of members of the state employees’ retirement system in accordance with a vote held under § 218(d)(7) of the Social Security Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-10

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 98, § 2; P.L. 1959, ch. 62, § 1.

36-7-11.
Request for referendum of state retirement system members.

With respect to employees of the state as defined in §

36-7-2(1)(i)

and (1)(ii), the retirement board, as defined in §

36-7-2(9)

, may request the governor to authorize a referendum to be conducted pursuant to § 218(d)(3) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 418(d)(3), as amended, on the question of whether service in positions covered by the state retirement system shall be excluded from or included under an agreement under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-11

.

36-7-12.
Request for referendum of city, town, or agency retirement system members.

With respect to the employees of any city or town or agency of the state included in §

36-7-2(1)(iii)

which has elected to participate in accordance with and pursuant to §§

36-7-6

and

36-7-7

, which employees are members of a retirement system, the legislative body of the city or town or agency may request the governor to authorize a referendum to be conducted pursuant to § 218(d)(3) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 418(d)(3), as amended, on the question of whether service in positions covered by the retirement system shall be excluded from or included under an agreement under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-12

.

36-7-13.
Commission to conduct referendum.

When request shall be made of the governor by the retirement board or by the legislative body of any city, town, or agency that a referendum be held pursuant to §§

36-7-10

—

36-7-21

, the governor shall immediately appoint a commission consisting of seven (7) members who shall conduct the referendum pursuant to the provisions of §§

36-7-10

—

36-7-21

and of § 218(d) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 418(d), as amended, and the commission is hereby empowered to adopt such rules and regulations for conducting the election including the notice and manner thereof as shall not be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter and of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

It shall be the duty of the commission to study, evaluate, and recommend a plan for the inclusion of those members under the federal Social Security Act, to formulate the question to be voted upon in the referendum, and to carry out the purposes of §§

36-7-10

—

36-7-21

.

The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services but are authorized to contract for secretarial and actuarial services and to incur travel and other necessary expenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-13

.

36-7-14.
Authorization of referendum.

The referendum shall be authorized as of the date fixed by the governor. The governor shall designate the commission, provided for in §

36-7-13

, to supervise the conduct of the referendum in accordance with the requirements of said § 218(d)(3) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 418(d)(3).

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-14

.

36-7-15.
Notice of referendum — Benefits equal to retirement system.

The notice of the referendum and the ballot to be used thereon shall contain a statement setting forth the changes or revisions to be made in the plan of benefit and contributions governing the retirement system, and the obligations which would be imposed on the members of the system if their services are included under an agreement pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Total benefits to the present members, and to the dependents of those members, under the plan of coordination of the benefits of the retirement system with the old age and survivors insurance provisions of title II of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 401 et seq., shall at least be equal to the benefits payable to them under the retirement system prior to social security coverage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-15

.

36-7-16.
Eligibility to vote in referendum.

Only eligible employees as defined in § 218(d)(3) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 418(d)(3), as amended, shall be eligible to vote in the referendum. Persons who have retired and who are in receipt of payment from the retirement system shall be ineligible to vote.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-16

.

36-7-17.
Majority required for inclusion of retirement system members under social security.

The affirmative approval of at least a majority of the members of the retirement system eligible to vote in the referendum shall determine the inclusion of the members of the retirement system under an agreement under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-17

.

36-7-18.
Interval between referenda.

Should a referendum fail to gain approval, a subsequent referendum among members of the retirement system shall not be held until a period of at least three (3) years has elapsed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-18

.

36-7-19.
Certification of results of referendum.

Upon receipt of satisfactory proof with respect to a referendum that the conditions specified in § 218(d)(3) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 418(d)(3), have been met, the governor shall certify to the secretary that the conditions were met. Proper steps to give effect to the results of the referendum shall be taken by the general treasurer within a period of two (2) years of the date of the referendum.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-19

.

36-7-20.
Expense of referendum.

The expense incident to the holding of a referendum shall be assumed by the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-20

.

36-7-21.
Intent to preserve retirement system protection.

It is the intention of the general assembly by the adoption of §§

36-7-10

—

36-7-21

that the protection afforded employees in positions covered by a retirement system, as herein defined, on the date an agreement is made applicable to service performed in those positions, or employees receiving regular payments under the retirement system at the date of the agreement, will not be impaired as a result of making the agreement so applicable or as a result of legislative enactment in anticipation of the adoption of the referendum.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-21

.

36-7-22.
Contributions imposed on city, town, and agency employees.

Each city, town, or agency of the state participating under the federal state agreement is authorized to impose upon each of its employees, as to services which are covered by the federal state agreement, or by any supplement thereto or modification thereof, a contribution with respect to his or her salary or wages as herein defined, equal to the amount of tax which would be imposed by § 3101 of the federal Insurance Contributions Act, 26 U.S.C. § 3101, if their services constituted employment within the meaning of that act. The obligation to make those contributions shall constitute a condition of employment by the city, town, or agency of the state with respect to the employee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 6; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-22

.

36-7-23.
Deductions by cities, towns, and agencies.

Contributions under §

36-7-22

by employees of any city, town, or agency of the state shall be made as deductions from each payment on account of salaries or wages as and when paid. Failure to deduct the contribution shall not relieve any employee, the city, town, or agency of the state employing that employee of liability therefor. Adjustments for any errors in contributions shall be made as required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 6; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-23

.

36-7-24.
State contributions.

The state shall make the contributions required under the federal state agreement as provided in §

36-7-3

, and the general treasurer is hereby authorized to make those payments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 6; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-24

.

36-7-25.
Payments by cities, towns, and agencies — Interest on delinquent payments.

Each city, town, or agency of the state participating under the federal state agreement as herein described shall make payment to the general treasurer of the state at such time or times as he or she may prescribe of the contributions with respect to salaries or wages as herein defined equal to the sum of the taxes which would be imposed by §§ 3101 and 3111 of the federal Insurance Contributions Act, 26 U.S.C. §§ 3101, 3111, if the services covered by the federal state agreement to which the city, town, or agency of the state has subscribed constituted employment within the meaning of that act. The payments shall be made to the state for the purpose of meeting the requirements of §

36-7-3(2)

. In the event any city, town, or agency of the state does not make payment of the required amounts at the time or times the amounts shall be due and payable, there shall be added as a part of the amounts payable, interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum from the date the amounts shall be due until paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 6; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-25

; P.L. 1981, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 230, § 1.

36-7-26.
Revolving fund — Payments to federal government.

All payments made by any city, town, or agency of the state shall be credited by the general treasurer to a revolving fund which shall be established with the approval of the governor and the director of administration and a sum sufficient for the purpose is hereby appropriated out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated.

Any payments by the general treasurer to the secretary of the treasury as hereinabove authorized and as provided in §

36-7-3(2)

, shall be charged to that fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 6; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-26

.

36-7-27.
Duties of general treasurer.

The general treasurer of the state shall represent the state in any and all matters arising during the operation of §§

36-7-1

—

36-7-31

and §

36-7-35

and in any agreements with the secretary relative to the administration of the provisions of this chapter. The general treasurer shall issue a directive explanatory of the method by which any city, town, or agency of the state may provide coverage for its employees, specifying the conditions and limitations of the federal legislation governing that coverage. He or she shall request the cities, towns, and agencies of the state to prepare reports in such form as the secretary may prescribe and to comply with any regulations as the secretary may promulgate for the proper and effective operation of this agreement. The duties of the general treasurer with respect to the operation of this agreement shall be ministerial only and shall in no way obligate the state or create any added responsibilities or obligations beyond the terms and conditions of §§

36-7-1

—

36-7-31

and §

36-7-35

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 3675, § 7; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-27

; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 1.

36-7-28.
Forwarding of contributions and reports by cities, towns, and agencies.

Each city, town, or agency of the state participating under this agreement shall forward to the general treasurer at such time or times and in the manner that he or she may specify the amounts of contribution payable by the participating employees and by the city, town, or agency of the state as an employer together with appropriate reports respecting such payments as may be required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 7; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-28

.

36-7-29.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 7; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-29

; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 385, § 1, effective July 9, 2016; P.L. 2016, ch. 400, § 1, effective July 9, 2016.

36-7-30.
Assurance of payment of amounts due from state agencies.

In order to secure the payment to the general treasurer of the sums required to be paid under this chapter by agencies of the state and to provide a guaranty of payment thereof similar to the guaranty provided for payments by a city or town, the general treasurer may require from any agency of the state reasonable assurance of payment to the state of the sums to be paid under this chapter during annual periods by guaranty, bond, or similar assurance satisfactory to the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 7; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-30

.

36-7-31.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as may be necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of §§

36-7-27

—

36-7-30

and §

36-7-35

and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums, or so much of the sums, as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2675, § 8; P.L. 1954, ch. 3407, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-31

; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 1.

36-7-32.
Validation of ordinances and resolutions.

All ordinances, resolutions, and votes adopted by all cities, towns, and agencies pursuant to the provisions of §§

36-7-1

—

36-7-31

as the sections were in effect prior to April 21, 1955, and all action taken pursuant to those ordinances, resolutions, and votes shall be valid and of the ordinances, resolutions, and votes force and effect as if the ordinances, resolutions, and votes were adopted pursuant to the provisions of §§

36-7-1

—

36-7-31

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3546, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-32

.

36-7-33.
Coverage of employees ineligible for retirement.

The state of Rhode Island is hereby authorized to enter into an agreement with the federal government to accept old age and survivors’ insurance for state employees who are unable to qualify as members of the state retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3613, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-7-33

.

36-7-33.1.
FICA Alternative Retirement Income Security Program.

For FARP eligible employees, the state shall establish the FICA Alternative Retirement Income Security Program. The FARP shall be administered in accordance with the following provisions:

IRC compliance. The FARP shall be administered as a defined contribution plan under section 401(a) of the IRC, and shall provide retirement benefits as required under section 3121(b)(7)(F) of the IRC.

Employee participation in the FARP— One-Time Opt-Out Exception. With the one exception described in (b) below, FARP-eligible employee participation in the FARP shall be mandatory. Each participant shall make mandatory payroll deduction contributions to the FARP equal to a minimum of seven and five tenths percent (7.5%) of the employee’s gross wages for each pay period. Any payroll deduction contributions made pursuant to the FARP shall not be included in the computation of federal income taxes withheld on behalf of any participant. Once implemented, the participants, and the state on behalf of the participants, shall not continue to make FICA contributions. The FARP shall be administered by the financial institution currently administering the 401(a) plan for the state employee retirement plan, as described in Title 36 Chapter 10.3.

An otherwise FARP-eligible employee, who is employed by the state at the time this section takes effect, may opt to not participate in the FARP. An employee who opts to not participate in the FARP will continue to make FICA contributions and the state shall continue to make FICA contributions on behalf of the employee. An employee who opts to not participate in the FARP may subsequently, without penalty, choose to participate in the FARP; provided, however, such employee must continue to participate in the FARP for as long as he or she is a FARP-eligible employee.

Review by state investment commission. The state investment commission shall, from time to time, review and evaluate the reasonableness of the selected financial institution’s fees and the performance of the selected financial institution’s funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 4, § 2.

36-7-34.
Positions covered by more than one system.

No provision of this chapter shall prevent coverage under the Social Security Act in accordance with § 218(d)(8), 42 U.S.C. § 418(d)(8), of the act of services of individuals in positions covered by more than one retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 62, § 2.

36-7-35.
Exclusion of sick pay from wages.

The state of Rhode Island is hereby authorized to exclude from wages, payments made under a written plan or system of sick leave. The written plan shall be established pursuant to this authority by the department of administration and must contain at least the following:

A method of determining sick pay eligibility;

A method of determining the duration of sick pay payment;

A method of determining the minimum amount of sick pay payment.

This plan shall be established by July 1, 1982.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 89, § 1.